Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 5 Commercial Shrimp Cast Netting Licenses

27-4-205.
Commercial shrimping license required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fish for shrimp with a cast net from the waters of the state for commercial sale for food purposes or to sell for food purposes any shrimp he or she has taken with a cast net from the waters of the state unless he or she is in possession of a commercial food shrimp cast netting license as provided in this part. Such license shall be required in addition to a commercial fishing boat license issued pursuant to Code Section 27-2-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 16; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 17/HB 100.

27-4-206.
Issuance of licenses; limits; fees.

The department may issue no more than 200 commercial food shrimp cast netting licenses as provided in this Code section. Such licenses shall be issued only to individuals and shall not be transferable.

If the number of licenses issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section does not total 200, the department may issue the remaining allotment of commercial food shrimp cast netting licenses in the initial or any subsequent license year by lottery devised and operated by the department. After such lottery has been conducted, any remaining unissued licenses may be issued via a method established by the department.

The department shall charge a license fee for the commercial food shrimp cast netting license in the amount of $250.00 for a resident commercial food shrimp cast netting license and $2,500.00 for a nonresident commercial food shrimp cast netting license.

Any license which is not renewed in subsequent license years shall revert to the department to be issued as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-206

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 16; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 18/HB 100; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 18/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted former subsection (b), which read: “(b) The department shall issue commercial food shrimp cast netting licenses for the 1998-1999 license year in order of the date and time the application was received to individuals who:

“(1) Were in possession of a valid 1997-1998 commercial fishing license issued on or before December 12, 1997;

“(2) Were listed as owner or captain of a valid 1997-1998 commercial fishing boat license on the application for which a cast net was indicated as a commercial harvest gear on or before December 12, 1997; and

“(3) Are able to provide evidence satisfactory to the department that they sold shrimp ex-vessel during the 1997-1998 license year on or before December 12, 1997.”; redesignated former subsections (c) through (e) as present subsections (b) through (d), respectively; substituted “subsection (a)” for “subsection (b)” near the beginning of subsection (b); and substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsection (c)” in subsection (d). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.